static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.aff
FLAG num
SFX 229 0 оуҙай/141 . +Act+Der/дай
SFX 229 0 оуса/143 . +Act+Der/са
SFX 229 0 оуҙағы/145 . +Act+Der/дағы
SFX 229 0 оуло/149 . +Act+Der/лы
SFX 229 0 оуһоҙ/153 . +Act+Abe
SFX 229 0 оуғаса/155 . +Act+Der/ҡаса
SFX 229 0 ормон/285 . +Fut+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 мам/283 . +Fut+PxSg1+Neg
SFX 229 0 маҫмын/295 . +Fut+PxSg1+Neg
SFX 229 0 орһоң/285 . +Fut+PxSg2
SFX 229 0 маҫһың/283 . +Fut+PxSg2+Neg
SFX 229 0 ор/289 . +Fut+PxSg3
SFX 229 0 орҙар/115 . +Prc+Pl
SFX 229 0 орҙоң/119 . +Prc+Gen
SFX 229 0 орға/121 . +Prc+Dat
SFX 229 0 орғараҡ . +Prc+Dat+Comp
SFX 229 0 орҙо/123 . +Prc+Acc
SFX 229 0 орҙан/117 . +Prc+Abl
SFX 229 0 орҙа/121 . +Prc+Loc
SFX 229 0 орҙараҡ . +Prc+Loc+Comp
SFX 229 0 ормон/128 . +Prc+Pred1Sg
SFX 229 0 орһоң/128 . +Prc+Pred2Sg
SFX 229 0 орбоҙ/132 . +Prc+Pred1Pl
SFX 229 0 орһоғоҙ/132 . +Prc+Pred2Pl
SFX 229 0 ор/197 . +Prc
SFX 229 0 ормо . +Prc+Q
SFX 229 0 ормолор . +Prc+Q+Indf
SFX 229 0 орҙор . +Prc+Indf
SFX 229 0 орсо . +Prc+Clt/сы
SFX 229 0 орҙоҡо/137 . +Prc+Poss
SFX 229 0 орҡай/139 . +Prc+Dim
SFX 229 0 орҙай/141 . +Prc+Der/дай
SFX 229 0 орса/143 . +Prc+Der/са
SFX 229 0 орҙағы/145 . +Prc+Der/дағы
SFX 229 0 орло/149 . +Prc+Der/лы
SFX 229 0 орһоҙ/153 . +Prc+Abe
SFX 229 0 орораҡ . +Prc+Comp
SFX 229 0 орғаса/155 . +Prc+Der/ҡаса
SFX 229 0 маҫ/293 . +Fut+PxSg3+Neg
SFX 229 0 маҫтар/115 . +Prc+Pl
SFX 229 0 маҫтың/117 . +Prc+Gen
SFX 229 0 маҫҡа/121 . +Prc+Dat
SFX 229 0 маҫҡараҡ . +Prc+Dat+Comp
SFX 229 0 маҫты/121 . +Prc+Acc
SFX 229 0 маҫтан/117 . +Prc+Abl
SFX 229 0 маҫта/121 . +Prc+Loc
SFX 229 0 маҫтараҡ . +Prc+Loc+Comp
SFX 229 0 маҫмын/126 . +Prc+Pred1Sg
SFX 229 0 маҫһың/126 . +Prc+Pred2Sg
SFX 229 0 маҫбыҙ/130 . +Prc+Pred1Pl
SFX 229 0 маҫһығыҙ/130 . +Prc+Pred2Pl
SFX 229 0 маҫ/205 . +Prc
SFX 229 0 маҫмы . +Prc+Q
SFX 229 0 маҫмылыр . +Prc+Q+Indf
SFX 229 0 маҫтыр . +Prc+Indf
SFX 229 0 маҫсы . +Prc+Clt/сы
SFX 229 0 маҫтыҡы/135 . +Prc+Poss
SFX 229 0 маҫҡай/139 . +Prc+Dim
SFX 229 0 маҫтай/141 . +Prc+Der/дай
SFX 229 0 маҫса/143 . +Prc+Der/са
SFX 229 0 маҫтағы/145 . +Prc+Der/дағы
SFX 229 0 маҫлы/147 . +Prc+Der/лы
SFX 229 0 маҫһыҙ/151 . +Prc+Abe
SFX 229 0 маҫҡаса/155 . +Prc+Der/ҡаса
SFX 229 0 маҫыраҡ . +Prc+Comp
SFX 229 0 орбоҙ/285 . +Fut+PxPl1
SFX 229 0 мабыҙ/283 . +Fut+PxPl1+Neg
SFX 229 0 маҫбыҙ/283 . +Fut+PxPl1+Neg
SFX 229 0 орһоғоҙ/285 . +Fut+PxPl2
SFX 229 0 маҫһығыҙ/283 . +Fut+PxPl2+Neg
SFX 229 0 орҙар/287 . +Fut+PxPl3
SFX 229 0 маҫтар/287 . +Fut+PxPl3+Neg
SFX 229 0 ҡо/302 . +Opt2
SFX 229 0 ҡом/298 . +Opt2+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 ҡоң/298 . +Opt2+PxSg2
SFX 229 0 ҡоһо/302 . +Opt2+PxSg3
SFX 229 0 ҡобоҙ/298 . +Opt2+PxPl1
SFX 229 0 ҡоғоҙ/298 . +Opt2+PxPl2
SFX 229 0 ҡолары/300 . +Opt2+PxPl3
SFX 229 0 аһы/300 . +GerFut3
SFX 229 0 аһыраҡ . +GerFut3+Comp
SFX 229 0 аһым/296 . +GerFut3+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 аһыбыҙ/296 . +GerFut3+PxPl1
SFX 229 0 аһылары/300 . +GerFut3+PxPl3
SFX 229 0 маҡсымын/304 . +FutPlan+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 маҡсыһың/304 . +FutPlan+PxSg2
SFX 229 0 маҡсы/310 . +FutPlan+PxSg3
SFX 229 0 маҡсыбыҙ/304 . +FutPlan+PxPl1
SFX 229 0 маҡсыһығыҙ/304 . +FutPlan+PxPl2
SFX 229 0 маҡсылар/307 . +FutPlan+PxPl3
SFX 229 0 оп/315 [^пкҡ] +GerPerf
SFX 229 0 обыраҡ [^пкҡ] +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 229 п боп/315 п +GerPerf
SFX 229 п бобыраҡ п +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 229 к гоп/315 к +GerPerf
SFX 229 к гобыраҡ к +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 229 ҡ ғоп/315 ҡ +GerPerf
SFX 229 ҡ ғобыраҡ ҡ +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 229 0 майынса/311 . +GerPerf
SFX 229 0 майынсараҡ . +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 229 0 майса/311 . +GerPerf
SFX 229 0 майсараҡ . +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 229 0 ҡансы/311 . +GerPerf
SFX 229 0 ҡансыраҡ . +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 229 0 орға/317 . +Inf
SFX 229 0 маҫҡа/317 . +Inf+Neg
