static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.dic
йолҡ/229	[Verb]
өҙөп-йолҡ/229	[Verb]
боҡ/229	[Verb]
йоҡ/229	[Verb]
бойоҡ/229	[Verb]
борлоҡ/229	[Verb]
йотлоҡ/229	[Verb]
тотлоҡ/229	[Verb]
тороҡ/229	[Verb]
тонсоҡ/229	[Verb]
йотоҡ/229	[Verb]
бошоҡ/229	[Verb]
борҡ/229	[Verb]
ос/229	[Verb]
ҡос/229	[Verb]
боҫ/229	[Verb]
ҡоҫ/229	[Verb]
һоҫ/229	[Verb]
от/229	[Verb]
сойорғот/229	[Verb]
сорғот/229	[Verb]
йот/229	[Verb]
ойот/229	[Verb]
молҡот/229	[Verb]
доңҡот/229	[Verb]
борҡот/229	[Verb]
йолот/229	[Verb]
онот/229	[Verb]
ҡорот/229	[Verb]
йонсот/229	[Verb]
ҡорсот/229	[Verb]
тот/229	[Verb]
борхот/229	[Verb]
ойоҡһот/229	[Verb]
болоҡһот/229	[Verb]
борсолдорт/229	[Verb]
дондорт/229	[Verb]
ҡойҙорт/229	[Verb]
тойҙорт/229	[Verb]
осорт/229	[Verb]
йоҡторт/229	[Verb]
ҡоторт/229	[Verb]
бош/229	[Verb]
йоғош/229	[Verb]
боҙош/229	[Verb]
ойош/229	[Verb]
ҡойош/229	[Verb]
молойош/229	[Verb]
йолҡош/229	[Verb]
боҙолош/229	[Verb]
йотонош/229	[Verb]
тотонош/229	[Verb]
буйһонош/229	[Verb]
орош/229	[Verb]
һоғондорош/229	[Verb]
ҡорош/229	[Verb]
ҡоторош/229	[Verb]
тотош/229	[Verb]
ҡотортош/229	[Verb]
